Utah statutes.
63G-7-703.   Reserve funds for payment of claims or purchase of insurance created by political subdivisions.

Any political subdivision may create and maintain a reserve fund or, may jointly with one or more other political subdivisions, make contributions to a joint reserve fund, for the purpose of:

(1)  making payment of claims against the cooperating subdivisions when they become payable under this chapter; or

(2)  for the purpose of purchasing liability insurance to protect the cooperating subdivisions from any or all risks created by this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

